Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,375
Electric personal assistive mobility device; exemptions from certain requirements.

An electric personal assistive mobility device, its owner, and its operator shall be exempt from the requirements of the Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, and the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 459;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 252;

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 105.

Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act, see section 60-101.

Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, see section 60-462.

Motor Vehicle Registration Act, see section 60-301.

Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, see section 60-569.